stems/stems-shaanxi.lexc
LEXICON PronDial
вә:вә        PrnPersSg1 ;
вәму:вәму    PrnPersPl1 ;
ңә:ңә        PrnPersSg1 ;
ңэ:ңэ        PrnPersSg1px ;
ңәму:ңәму    PrnPersPl1 ;
ңай:ңай      PrnPersPl1 ;
ана:ана      PrnPersPl3 ;
тана:тана    PrnPersPl3 ;
таму:таму    PrnPersPl3 ;

LEXICON ClsDial
гуә:гуә      Cls ;
гы:гы        Cls ;

LEXICON PrnPersSg1
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:  PrnPossSlot ;

LEXICON PrnPersSg1px
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<px%>:  # ;

LEXICON PrnPersPl1
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:  PrnPossSlot ;

LEXICON PrnPersPl3
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:  PrnPossSlot ;

LEXICON CopulaDial
шы:шы        Cop ;

LEXICON VerbDial
вый:вый      V ;
